District of Columbia statutes.
2-1212.33

Healthy food distribution.

(a)

The Department of Small and Local Business Development shall convene a working group to develop a plan for establishing a commercial distribution system for fresh produce and healthy foods to corner stores. Corner stores shall be encouraged to work cooperatively to maximize their buying power.

(b)

The working group shall include representatives from:

(1)

District agencies;

(2)

The grocery ambassador, designated under § 2-1212.23;

(3)

Nonprofit organizations;

(4)

Urban farmers and community gardeners;

(5)

Corner stores and their trade associations; and

(6)

Produce wholesalers.

(c)

The working group shall issue a report, including recommendations, to the Mayor and the Council.

(d)

The Department of Small and Local Business Development may issue grants, on a competitive basis, for the establishment of a commercial distribution system for fresh produce and healthy foods

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-353, § 303, 58 DCR 746